Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4874.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1281d. Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, the legislature shall appropriate not less than $12,300,000.00 each fiscal year for the purpose of making supplemental payments to rural districts, as described in section 22d of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1622d.